Wyoming statutes. Title 11 Agriculture, Livestock and Other Animals
Cross references. —

As to duties of state geologists, see §

9-2-803

.

As to Taylor Grazing Act funds, see §§

9-4-401

through

9-4-406

.

As to cooperative marketing associations, see §§

17-10-101

through

17-10-125

.

As to agriculture and extension work at the University of Wyoming, see §§

21-17-301

through

21-17-308

.

As to game and fish generally, see title 23.

As to roads and highways generally, see title 24.

As to breeders' liens, see §§

29-7-201

through

29-7-207

.

As to protection of livestock from mining shafts, see §

30-1-123

.

As to regulations for abandonment of mines with reference to the protection of persons and animals, see §

30-2-407

.

As to permitting or allowing natural gas to contaminate the atmosphere so as to injure growing crops, vegetables and livestock, see §

30-5-121

.

As to veterinarians, see §§

33-30-201

through

33-30-215

.

As to food and drugs generally, see chapter 7 of title 35.

As to public lands generally, see title 36.

As to water, water rights, irrigation and drainage generally, see title 41.

Revision of title. —

Laws 1978, ch. 32, §§ 1 and 2, revised this title, amending and renumbering §§

11-1-101

through 11-28-201 and

11-29-101

through

11-44-104

as §§

11-1-101

through

11-39-104

, and amending and renumbering §§ 11-28-301 through 11-28-307 as §§ 29-7-107 through 29-7-113.Section 11-5-122, enacted by § 1, ch. 27, Laws 1978, was renumbered §

11-5-201

by the revisor of statutes.

Sections

11-18-114

through 11-18-116 have been excluded in this revised title. See Editor's notes under these section numbers.

No detailed explanation of the changes made by the 1978 act has been attempted, but historical citations to former provisions and annotations from cases decided under former provisions have been placed under comparable sections in this title where appropriate. See tables of revised and renumbered sections in Volume 11.

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Rise and Fall of Grazing Reform,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 413 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

3 Am. Jur. 2d Agriculture § 1 et seq.; 4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals § 1 et seq.; 21A Am. Jur. 2d Crops § 1 et seq.; 45 Am. Jur. 2d Irrigation § 1 et seq.; 52 Am. Jur. 2d Markets and Marketing § 1 et seq.

Who is a “farmer” within provisions of Bankruptcy Act (§ 75) for agricultural compositions and extensions, 3 ALR2d 544.

Effectiveness of reservation of vendor's crop rights in land contracts in absence of such reservation in deed later executed, 8 ALR2d 565.

What constitutes “farm use” within provision of insurance policy, 10 ALR2d 674.

Cooperative marketing of farm products by producers' associations, 12 ALR2d 130.

Admissibility in condemnation proceedings of opinion evidence as to probable profits derivable from land condemned if devoted to particular agricultural purposes, 16 ALR2d 1113.

Liability of owner or operator of place of public resort, other than animal exhibitor, to patron injured by animal or insect, 17 ALR2d 459, 64 ALR4th 963.

Injury by animal as willful and malicious injury so as to preclude it or judgment procured on it from operation of discharge in bankruptcy, 26 ALR2d 1368.

Insurance on animals: risks and losses covered, 29 ALR2d 790.

Person in charge of livestock on highway as “pedestrian” with respect to rights given, and duties imposed, by traffic rules and regulations, 30 ALR2d 866.

Sufficiency of description of property, as against third persons, in chattel mortgage on farm equipment, machinery, implements, and the like, 32 ALR2d 929.

Measure and elements of recovery of buyer rescinding sale of domestic animal for seller's breach of warranty, 35 ALR2d 1273.

Liability for statement or publication representing plaintiff as cruel to or killer of animals, 39 ALR2d 1388.

Statutory liability for physical injuries inflicted by animal as surviving defendant's death, 40 ALR2d 543.

Conversion, identification of animals involved in, 51 ALR2d 1154.

What constitutes “agricultural” or “farm” labor within social security or Unemployment Compensation Acts, 53 ALR2d 406.

Liability for injury to property inflicted by wild animals, 57 ALR2d 242.

Injunction against repeated or continuing trespasses by interference with crops, 60 ALR2d 310.

Landlord's liability to tenant, or member of tenant's family, for injury by animal or insect, 67 ALR2d 1005.

Master's liability to servant injured by farm machinery, 67 ALR2d 1120.

What constitutes “farm produce” or “farm product” within coverage of fire insurance policy, 71 ALR2d 1266.

Life tenant's and remainderman's rights as to increase in livestock, 76 ALR2d 162.

Measure and elements of damages, in action other than one against a carrier, for conversion, injury, loss or destruction of livestock, 79 ALR2d 677.

Liability to social guest injured by animal, 79 ALR2d 990.

Sharecropper's share in crop wholly or partly unharvested as subject to garnishment, 82 ALR2d 858.

Construction and effect of provision for payment of damages to “crops” or “growing crops” in mineral deed or lease or in conveyance of pipeline or other underground easement, 87 ALR2d 235.

Validity, construction and effect of contract between grower of vegetable or fruit crops, and purchasing processor, packer or canner, 87 ALR2d 732.

Construction and effect of restrictive covenant in deed or conveyance specifically prohibiting or limiting the keeping of animals on the premises, 89 ALR2d 990.

Rights in growing, unmatured annual crops as between personal representative of decedent's estate and heirs or devisees, 92 ALR2d 1373.

Personal liability of public officer for killing or injuring animal while carrying out statutory duties with respect to it, 2 ALR3d 822.

Farmer's comprehensive personal liability insurance, 8 ALR3d 916.

Master's liability to agricultural worker injured other than by farm machinery, 9 ALR3d 1061.

Determination of amount payable on loss to growing crop under policy insuring against loss or injury, 20 ALR3d 924.

Owner's or keeper's liability for personal injury or death inflicted by wild animal, 21 ALR3d 603.

What constitutes total or permanent disability within the coverage of disability insurance coverage issued to farmer or agricultural worker, 26 ALR3d 714.

Liability for injury consequent upon spraying or dusting of crops, 37 ALR3d 833.

Validity and construction of statute prohibiting sale within state of skin or body of specified wild animals or of the animal itself, 44 ALR3d 1008.

Excessiveness or adequacy of damages awarded for personal injuries resulting in death of persons engaged in farming, ranching or agricultural labor, 46 ALR3d 733.

Rights in respect to crops as between estate of life tenant and remainderman, 47 ALR3d 784.

Grazing of livestock or gathering of natural crop as fulfilling traditional elements of adverse possession, 48 ALR3d 818.

Liability of owner or operator of business premises for injuries to patron caused by insect or small animal, 48 ALR3d 1257.

Liability of oil and gas lessee or operator for injuries to or death of livestock, 51 ALR3d 304.

Zoo as nuisance, 58 ALR3d 1126.

Contracts for artificial insemination of cattle, 61 ALR3d 811.

Sufficiency of description of crops under Uniform Commercial Code §§ 34.1-9-203(a)(ii) and 34.1-9-402(a), 67 ALR3d 308.

Exemption of agricultural activities or occupations from business or occupation license or tax, 38 ALR4th 1074.

Livestock or animal insurance: risks and losses, 47 ALR4th 772.

Tort liability for pollution from underground storage tank, 5 ALR5th 1.

Liability for injury inflicted by horse, dog, or other domestic animal exhibited at show, 68 ALR5th 599.

Construction of § 1 of the Capper-Volstead Act (7 U.S.C. § 291) authorizing persons engaged in production of agricultural
products to act together in association,
20 ALR Fed 924.

3 C.J.S. Agriculture §§ 2, 3, 5, 15 to 19, 23.